Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 38 Inspection of Motor Vehicles

31-38-1.
Vehicles without required equipment or in unsafe condition — Inspection sticker for used cars for sale required.

No person shall sell at retail, drive, or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer or any combination of them unless the equipment upon the vehicle is in good working order and adjustment as required in this title, and the vehicle is in such safe mechanical condition as not to endanger the driver or other occupant or any person upon the highway.

No dealer of used vehicles, as defined by §

31-1-19(b)

, shall sell at retail a used motor vehicle unless a new inspection of the vehicle conforming to the standards set pursuant to this chapter and chapter 47.1 of this title has been conducted and the vehicle has a new certificate of inspection affixed to the windshield at the time of sale, except used cars sold “for parts only” and clearly identified accordingly on the bill of sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 222, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 96; P.L. 1990, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 2.

31-38-2.
Inspection by any proper officer.

The director of the department of revenue, members of the state and local police, and any other officers and employees of the division of motor vehicles as the director of the department of revenue may designate, may at any time require the seller at retail or driver of the vehicle to stop and submit the vehicle to an inspection and test with reference to it as may be appropriate.

In the event the vehicle is found to be in unsafe condition or any required part or equipment is not in proper repair and adjustment, the officer shall give a written notice to the seller at retail or driver and shall send a copy to the director of the department of revenue. The notice shall require that the vehicle be placed in safe condition and its equipment in proper repair and adjustment, specifying the particulars with reference to it, and that the notice be approved within five (5) days.

The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, upon written notice, may require the seller at retail, owner, or driver to submit the vehicle to the state inspection facility for inspection. If the notice is not complied with, the director may suspend the registration of the vehicle described in the notice.

If three (3) notices are issued in a twelve (12) month period for any motor vehicle for the same or substantially the same unsafe condition or required part or equipment not being in proper repair and adjustment, the director shall suspend the registration of the vehicle described in the notice, and the owner shall be subject for each violation to fines enumerated in § 31-41.4-4.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 249, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 311, § 2.

31-38-3.
Owners and drivers to comply with inspection laws.

No seller at retail or person driving a vehicle shall refuse to submit the vehicle to an inspection and test as required by §

31-38-2

.

Every seller at retail, owner, or driver, upon receiving a notice as provided in §

31-38-2

, shall comply with it and shall within five (5) days forward the approved notice to the department of revenue. In the event of noncompliance with this subsection, the vehicle shall not be operated on any highways of this state.

Any vehicle which is found to be in such unsafe condition as to the brakes, steering, or other equipment as to be hazardous to permit it to be sold or driven from the place of inspection, then the vehicle shall not be permitted to be operated under its own power. The registration shall be immediately suspended by the department of revenue and the plates and certificates immediately returned to the department of revenue.

In the event repair or adjustment of any vehicle or its equipment is found necessary upon inspection, the seller at retail or owner of the vehicle may obtain the repair or adjustment at any place he or she may choose, but in every event an approval shall be obtained, otherwise the vehicle shall not be operated upon the highways of this state.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 125; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-4.
Director of department of revenue to require periodic inspection.

The director of revenue shall at least once each year, but not more frequently than twice each year, or on the schedule defined pursuant to chapter 47.1 of this title require that every vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer registered in this state or upon a retail seller’s premise, be inspected and that an official certificate of inspection and approval be obtained for the vehicle, provided, that the director of revenue shall require the first inspection of any new motor vehicle within two (2) years from the date of purchase or before the vehicle accumulates twenty-four thousand (24,000) miles whichever occurs first.

The inspections shall be made and the certificates obtained with respect to the mechanism, brakes, and equipment of the vehicle as shall be designated by the director of department of revenue.

The director of the department of revenue is authorized to make necessary rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to, upgraded standards of operation and standards for mechanical testing equipment, and to designate any period or periods of time during which sellers at retail and owners of any vehicles, subject to this chapter, shall display upon the vehicles certificates of inspection and approval, or shall produce these certificates upon demand of any proper officer or employee of the department of revenue designated by the director of the department of revenue. In addition, the director shall require each inspection facility to file a copy of their active garage keeper’s legal liability insurance policy and maintain a minimum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) liability coverage. Said coverage shall be purchased for the purpose of insuring against any damage sustained to a vehicle while under the control of the inspection facility.

The director of the department of revenue may authorize the acceptance in this state of a certificate of inspection and approval issued in another state having an inspection law similar to this chapter, and may extend the time within which a certificate shall be obtained.

The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, may suspend the registration of any vehicle which he or she determines is in such unsafe condition as to constitute a menace to safety, or which, after notice and demand, is not equipped as required in this chapter or for which a required certificate of inspection and approval has not been obtained.

The director of the department of revenue shall provide for a staggered inspection system by regulations.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 43; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 125; P.L. 2005, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-5.
Inspection of vehicles purchased outside the state.

When a motor vehicle is purchased out of state by a resident of this state, the owner of the vehicle shall have five (5) business days from the date of registering the vehicle to obtain a certificate of inspection as required by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2.

31-38-6.
Appointment of official inspection stations.

For the purpose of making inspections and issuing official certificates of inspection and approval as provided in this chapter, the director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, shall issue permits for and furnish instructions and all necessary forms to official inspection stations for the inspection of vehicles as required in this chapter and the issuance of official certificates of inspection and approval. There shall be a separate permit required to inspect all trailers or semi-trailers used to transport horses or other livestock, irrespective of the registered gross weight of the trailers and semi-trailers.

Application for the permit set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be made upon an official form and shall be granted only when the director of the department of revenue or the director’s designee, is satisfied that the station is properly equipped and has competent personnel to make the inspections and adjustments, and will be properly conducted. The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, before issuing a permit may require the applicant to file a bond conditioned that it will make compensation for any damage to a vehicle during an inspection or adjustment due to negligence on the part of the applicant or its employees.

The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, shall properly supervise and cause inspections to be made of the stations and shall suspend or revoke and require the surrender of the permit issued to a station which he or she finds is not properly equipped or has violated any of the conditions of his or her permit of inspection. The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, shall maintain and post at the department of revenue lists of all stations holding permits and of those whose permits have been suspended or revoked.

The permits shall be issued for a period of one year and upon payment to the director of the department of revenue of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) annually, and the monies received shall be turned over to the general treasurer to be deposited in the general funds of the state.

The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, shall issue a duplicate permit upon the payment of a fee of one dollar ($1.00) if one is requested by the owner of the official station who states in writing that the original was lost, destroyed, or stolen.

Any person who has been issued a permit under this section and conducts inspections of vehicles subject to an emission inspection pursuant to chapter 47.1 of this title must also have been authorized to conduct motor vehicle emissions inspections and must conduct both inspections simultaneously.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-7.
Operation of official stations.

No permit for an official station shall be assigned or transferred or used at any location other than designated in it, and the permit shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the designated location.

The state-certified person operating an official inspection station shall issue a certificate of inspection and approval upon an official form to the owner of a vehicle upon inspection of the vehicle and determining that its equipment required under the provisions of this chapter is in good condition and proper adjustment, otherwise, no certificate shall be issued. A record and report shall be made of every inspection and every certificate issued. The records shall be kept available for review by those employees of the department of revenue that the director may designate.

The following fees shall be charged for inspection and issuance of certificate of inspection and approval:

For every vehicle with a registered gross weight of not more than eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.), the fee shall be included with the fee charged pursuant to §

31-47.1-11

;

For every vehicle of a registered gross weight of more than eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) or more, except trailers, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

For every motorcycle and electrically powered vehicle, eleven dollars ($11.00);

For every trailer or semi-trailer with a registered gross weight of more than one thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.), eleven dollars ($11.00); and

Provided, that for the inspection of vehicles used for the transportation of persons for hire, as provided in §

31-22-12

, and subject to an inspection pursuant to chapter 47.1 of this title, the fee shall be included with the fee charged pursuant to §

31-47.1-11

.

The director of the department of revenue may establish a state inspection facility at which any motor vehicle may be reinspected at no cost to the owner. The state inspection facility may inspect all public conveyance vehicles or these inspections may be otherwise provided for by the director, or any other vehicles which, in the opinion of the director of revenue, or his or her designee, require specific testing to ensure for the health and safety of the general public.

Any other inspections or activities which may be required to be performed at a state inspection facility may be performed at any official inspection station if determined by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 5; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 44, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 7.

31-38-8.
Improper representation as official station.

No person shall in any manner represent any place as an official inspection station unless the station is operating under a valid permit issued by the director of the department of revenue or the director’s designee.

No person other than a state certified employee of an inspection station shall issue a certificate of inspection and approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-9.
False certificates.

No person shall make, issue, or knowingly use any imitation or counterfeit of an official certificate of inspection.

No person shall display or cause or permit to be displayed, upon any vehicle any certificate of inspection and approval knowing the certificate to be fictitious or issued for another vehicle or issued without an inspection having been made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2.

31-38-10.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of permit.

The director may deny an application for a permit or suspend or revoke a permit after it has been granted for any of the following reasons:

On proof of unfitness of the applicant to do business as a motor vehicle inspection station;

For any misstatement by the applicant in the application for the permit;

For any failure to comply with the provisions of this section or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the director of the department of revenue;

For defrauding any customer;

For dismantling any vehicle for repair without the authorization of the owner;

For refusal to surrender any vehicle to its owner upon tender of payment of the proper charges for towing and/or work done on the vehicle;

For having indulged in any unconscionable practice relating to the business as a motor vehicle inspection station;

For willful failure to perform work as contracted for;

For failure to comply with the safety standards of the industry;

For failure to properly equip and/or conduct the inspection station;

For failure to pay the required fees as provided in this chapter;

For providing an inspection sticker to a motor vehicle which is equipped with a sunscreening device which does not comply with the provisions of chapter 23.3 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-11.
Penalty for violation.

Any person violating any of the provisions of §§

31-38-1

—

31-38-1

0 of this chapter, or of the rules and regulations established by the director of the department of revenue as provided in this chapter, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment of not more than thirty (30) days or by both a fine and imprisonment. The director of the department of revenue shall revoke the permit of any inspection station who shall be convicted more than once for violations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-12.
Fee for inspection certificates.

The director of the department of revenue, or his or her designee, shall collect a fee of four dollars ($4.00) for each certificate of inspection issued, and the monies received shall be turned over to the general treasurer to be deposited in the general funds of the state.

Unused inspection stickers purchased by inspection stations shall be re-purchased by the state if returned in good condition to the director of the department of revenue or his or her designee within three (3) months of the inspection year for which the sticker was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-13.
Fleet operators.

Every person who shall provide maintenance facilities for the servicing of vehicles used in his or her business, except licensed motor vehicle dealers, which facilities shall be approved by the director of the department of revenue, and shall maintain any records and follow any procedures that shall be established by the director, shall be qualified as an official inspection station for the vehicles. The person shall not issue inspection certificates for any vehicle not used in the operation of the business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-14.
Vehicles exempt from inspections.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from inspections:

All trailers or semi-trailers having a gross weight of one thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.) or less;

Any special mobile equipment which is not required to be registered; and

Vehicles that are limited in their scope of operation as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

The exemption in this section does not relieve the owner of the vehicle from the obligation of having a safe vehicle on the public highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-15.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 68; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 8, effective July 5, 2019.

31-38-16.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 8, effective July 5, 2019.

31-38-17.
Procedure for a review of an order of the director of revenue.

Any person aggrieved by an order of the director of revenue pertaining to either a suspension, revocation, or denial of an application for a permit may appeal from the order of the director by filing a notice of request for review of the director’s order with the sixth division of the district court pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

42-35-15

.

The filing of a petition to review shall not operate as a stay of the order of the director of revenue and the order shall remain in full force and effect during the pendency of the review.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 12; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 14; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.

31-38-18.
Conduct of hearings.

The director of the department of revenue shall hold and conduct hearings in accordance with §

31-38-17

. These hearings shall be governed by rules to be adopted by the director of the department of revenue, and the director of the department of revenue shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The director of the department of revenue may subpoena witnesses and require the producing of documental evidence in order to make decisions affecting the interest of the motor vehicle inspection owner and/or operator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 7.

31-38-19.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter will be severable and if any of the provisions shall be held to be invalid the decision of the court respecting the provision or provisions shall not affect the validity of any other provision which can be given effect without the invalid provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2.

31-38-20.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate, out of any money not otherwise appropriated, any sums that it may deem necessary for the purpose of this chapter. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of it that may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers approved by the director of the department of revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 26.